New York, session 2025-2026, A7120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 577 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 577. Violent felon removed from deed with victim. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "violent felony offense" shall have the same meaning set forth in 7 subdivision one of section 70.02 of the penal law; 8 (b) "victim of domestic violence" shall mean any person who is a 9 victim of an act which would constitute a violent felony offense; and 10 (i) such act or acts have resulted in actual physical or emotional 11 injury or have created a substantial risk of physical or emotional harm 12 to such person or such person's child; and 13 (ii) such act or acts are or are alleged to have been committed by a 14 family or household member. 15 2. Any victim of domestic violence who holds title to real property 16 with the person who was convicted of the violent felony offense which 17 constituted the domestic violence against such victim may apply to the 18 county clerk in the county in which such real property is located to 19 remove the name of such violent felony offender from the deed of such 20 real property. Application shall be made in a manner and form to be 21 determined by such county clerk. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06841-01-5